src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
tehä:te v3_tehha ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
tehhä:te v3_tehha ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
tehjä:te v3_tehha ;
nähhä:nä v3_nahha ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
nähä:nä v3_nahha ;
nähjä:nä v3_nahha ;
tulla:tul v4 ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
mennä:men v4 ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
purra:pur v4 ;
panna:pan v4 ;
laasta:laas v4 ;
julkasta:julkas v4_julkasta ;
tohasta:tohas v4_julkasta ;
vaijasta:vaijas v4_julkasta ;
oijasta:oijas v4_julkasta ;
karjasta:karjas v4_julkasta ;
lakasta:lakas v4_julkasta ;
lohkasta:lohkas v4_julkasta ;
puhkasta:puhkas v4_julkasta ;
oikasta:oikas v4_julkasta ;
muikasta:muikas v4_julkasta ;
inkkasta:inkkas v4_julkasta ;
toukkasta:toukkas v4_julkasta ;
valkasta:valkas v4_julkasta ;
vilkasta:vilkas v4_julkasta ;
juokasta:juokas v4_julkasta ;
karkasta:karkas v4_julkasta ;
niuskasta:niuskas v4_julkasta ;
nuuskasta:nuuskas v4_julkasta ;
ratkasta:ratkas v4_julkasta ;
itkasta:itkas v4_julkasta ;
potkasta:potkas v4_julkasta ;
aukasta:aukas v4_julkasta ;
liukasta:liukas v4_julkasta ;
lukasta:lukas v4_julkasta ;
valasta:valas v4_julkasta ;
vihlasta:vihlas v4_julkasta ;
vuolasta:vuolas v4_julkasta ;
imasta:imas v4_julkasta ;
ilmasta:ilmas v4_julkasta ;
kirmasta:kirmas v4_julkasta ;
juumasta:juumas v4_julkasta ;
kiernasta:kiernas v4_julkasta ;
kraapasta:kraapas v4_julkasta ;
lipasta:lipas v4_julkasta ;
kolpasta:kolpas v4_julkasta ;
kopasta:kopas v4_julkasta ;
lippasta:lippas v4_julkasta ;
nupasta:nupas v4_julkasta ;
hierasta:hieras v4_julkasta ;
kirasta:kiras v4_julkasta ;
suorasta:suoras v4_julkasta ;
purasta:puras v4_julkasta ;
klopsasta:klopsas v4_julkasta ;
kusasta:kusas v4_julkasta ;
vetasta:vetas v4_julkasta ;
kutasta:kutas v4_julkasta ;
tiivasta:tiivas v4_julkasta ;
ilvasta:ilvas v4_julkasta ;
haista:hais v4 ;
vaihkaista:vaihkais v4_julkasta ;
tuhkaista:tuhkais v4_julkasta ;
kuokaista:kuokais v4_julkasta ;
tuiskaista:tuiskais v4_julkasta ;
vetkaista:vetkais v4_julkasta ;
tiukaista:tiukais v4_julkasta ;
kiemaista:kiemais v4_julkasta ;
tempaista:tempais v4_julkasta ;
puraista:purais v4_julkasta ;
vitaista:vitais v4_julkasta ;
kohista:kohis v4_julkasta ;
kuhista:kuhis v4_julkasta ;
kalista:kalis v4_julkasta ;
jolista:jolis v4_julkasta ;
molista:molis v4_julkasta ;
jamista:jamis v4_julkasta ;
humista:humis v4_julkasta ;
kapista:kapis v4_julkasta ;
napista:napis v4_julkasta ;
vapista:vapis v4_julkasta ;
kopista:kopis v4_julkasta ;
klopista:klopis v4_julkasta ;
lupista:lupis v4_julkasta ;
karista:karis v4_julkasta ;
narista:naris v4_julkasta ;
korista:koris v4_julkasta ;
morista:moris v4_julkasta ;
torista:toris v4_julkasta ;
hurista:huris v4_julkasta ;
murista:muris v4_julkasta ;
purista:puris v4_julkasta ;
natista:natis v4_julkasta ;
protista:protis v4_julkasta ;
mutista:mutis v4_julkasta ;
tutista:tutis v4_julkasta ;
nosta:nos v4 ;
juosta:juo v4_juosta ;
kusta:kus v4 ;
nousta:nous v4_sta ;
pierrä:pier v4 ;
piestä:pieks v4 ;
pestä:pes v4 ;
pyhkästä:pyhkäs v4_julkasta ;
kyhistä:kyhis v4_julkasta ;
jähistä:jähis v4_julkasta ;
rähistä:rähis v4_julkasta ;
vikistä:vikis v4_julkasta ;
hökistä:hökis v4_julkasta ;
kilistä:kilis v4_julkasta ;
jylistä:jylis v4_julkasta ;
kälistä:kälis v4_julkasta ;
mölistä:mölis v4_julkasta ;
jymistä:jymis v4_julkasta ;
rämistä:rämis v4_julkasta ;
klipistä:klipis v4_julkasta ;
höpistä:höpis v4_julkasta ;
hiristä:hiris v4_julkasta ;
liristä:liris v4_julkasta ;
piristä:piris v4_julkasta ;
jyristä:jyris v4_julkasta ;
häristä:häris v4_julkasta ;
märistä:märis v4_julkasta ;
täristä:täris v4_julkasta ;
löristä:löris v4_julkasta ;
pöristä:pöris v4_julkasta ;
ritistä:ritis v4_julkasta ;
hytistä:hytis v4_julkasta ;
prätistä:prätis v4_julkasta ;
viekäistä:viekäis v4_julkasta ;
läväistä:läväis v4_julkasta ;
viekästä:viekäs v4_julkasta ;
nyhkästä:nyhkäs v4_julkasta ;
häikästä:häikäs v4_julkasta ;
nykästä:nykäs v4_julkasta ;
syökästä:syökäs v4_julkasta ;
silmästä:silmäs v4_julkasta ;
häpästä:häpäs v4_julkasta ;
hävästä:häväs v4_julkasta ;
päästä:pääs v4 ;
sylkästä:sylkäs v4 ;
präikästä:präikäs v4 ;
huitasta:huitas v4 ;
syljästä:syljäs v4_julkasta ;
